Arkansas, session 2025, SB281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 2, Chapter 1, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 4 — Producer Bill of Rights for Commodity Checkoff Programs Act

2-1-401. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Producer Bill
of Rights for Commodity Checkoff Programs Act".

2-1-402. Intent.
The General Assembly intends for this subchapter to improve the
commodity checkoff programs by:
(1) Ensuring producer control of funds;
*CRH140*
02/21/2025 7:41:22 AM CRH140

SB281
(2) Enhancing transparency;
(3) Increasing producer engagement;
(4) Improving record keeping and access to records;
(5) Identifying new efficiencies through cooperation amongst the
commodity checkoff programs; and
(6) Seeking to better account for investment returns to
producers.

2-1-403. Applicability — Use of funds — Cooperation.
(a) This subchapter shall apply to the following commodity checkoff
programs:
(1) Arkansas Soybean Promotion Board, created under § 2-20-404;
(2) Arkansas Wheat Promotion Board, created under § 2-20-604;
(3) Arkansas Rice Research and Promotion Board, created under §
2-20-505;
(4) Arkansas Corn and Grain Sorghum Promotion Board, created
under § 2-20-804;
(5) Arkansas Catfish Promotion Board, created under § 2-9-103;
(6) Arkansas Beef Council, created under § 2-35-303.
(b)(1) Funds collected by a commodity checkoff program listed in
subsection (a) of this section shall be used only for purposes approved by
the commodity checkoff program and as provided by law.
(2) The funds shall not be used for general support of the
Department of Agriculture unless specifically authorized by the commodity
checkoff program.
(c) The commodity checkoff programs under subsection (a) of this
section shall consider opportunities to cooperate with each other to:
(1) Achieve efficiencies;
(2) Reduce duplicative efforts; and
(3) Strengthen efforts on common interests.

2-1-404. Producer engagement.
(a)(1) A commodity checkoff program listed in § 2-1-403(a) shall
publish on its website or on a related Department of Agriculture website a
notice of commodity checkoff program meetings.
(2) The commodity checkoff program shall:
02/21/2025 7:41:22 AM CRH140

SB281
(A) Provide open access to the commodity checkoff program
meeting;
(B) Permit in-person or virtual attendance, as applicable;
(C) Encourage producer engagement at the meeting; and
(D) Publish on its website or on a related department
website a document that summarizes each commodity checkoff program meeting,
including without limitation any action taken by the commodity checkoff
program, documents presented at the meeting, and producer comments received
at the meeting.
(b)(1) A commodity checkoff program shall provide a producer portal on
the commodity checkoff program's website or a related department website that
allows the producer to provide public comment to the commodity checkoff
program.
(2) The department shall publish on its website a link to each
commodity checkoff program's website for ease of producer access.
(c) At least annually, a commodity checkoff program shall solicit
comment from producers engaged in the production of the relevant commodity to
seek input for research and promotion activities.

2-1-405. Records — Reporting.
(a) A commodity checkoff program required to comply with this
subchapter shall make available and publish on the website of the commodity
checkoff program or a related Department of Agriculture website a copy of all
records maintained by the commodity checkoff program, including without
limitation the following:
(1) Meeting minutes;
(2) Financial reports;
(3) Nonconfidential and nonproprietary research reports;
(4) Promotion reports;
(5) Records related to use of funds;
(6) Nonconfidential and nonproprietary documents and
presentations provided during a meeting; and
(7) Meeting agendas, attachments, and, if available, recordings.
(b)(1)(A) A recipient of grant funds of ten thousand dollars ($10,000)
or more from a commodity checkoff program subject to this subchapter shall
provide an annual summary to the commodity checkoff program of the work done
02/21/2025 7:41:22 AM CRH140

SB281
and value provided using the grant funds for each year of the life of the
grant.
(B) The summary provided under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of
this section shall include without limitation:
(i) Nonconfidential and nonproprietary detailed
information on the purpose of the project funded with grant funds from the
commodity checkoff program;
(ii) Project outcomes and findings; and
(iii) An estimated return on investment value or
value proposition.
(2) A commodity checkoff program shall maintain a log of all
research and research reports provided by a recipient on the commodity
checkoff program's website or a related department website.
(c) A report provided by a commodity checkoff program to the General
Assembly shall also be published on the commodity checkoff program's website
or a related department website.




















02/21/2025 7:41:22 AM CRH140